Washington statutes.
RCW 27.40.036

Sale or trade of acquired documents or materials—Use of proceeds.

Documents or materials acquired under the provisions of RCW 27.40.034 may be sold, or may be traded for other documents or materials. The proceeds from the sale of any such documents or materials may be used to acquire additional documents or materials or may be used to defray the cost of operating the museum.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 159 s 2.]